Massachusetts, session 194th, H3186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 58 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "section", in line 5, the following
words:-; provided, however, that if the measurable acreage of land pursuant to section 13 in the
city or town has remained the same or increased from the previous fiscal year, the total amount
reimbursed to a city or town by the commonwealth pursuant to section 17 shall not be less than
the amount that was reimbursed to the city or town in the previous fiscal year.
SECTION 2. Section 17 of chapter 58 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "sixty-three", in line 7, the
following words:- ; provided, however, that if the measurable acreage of land pursuant to section
13 in the city or town has remained the same or increased from the previous fiscal year, the total
of 2

amount reimbursed to a city or town by the commonwealth shall not be less than the amount that
was reimbursed to the city or town in the previous fiscal year.
SECTION 3. Section 108 of chapter 218 of the acts of 2016 is hereby amended by
striking out section 16 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 16. The commissioner shall annually deliver, to the state treasurer, a statement of
the fair cash valuation reimbursement percentage for each city and town in which state-owned
land is located, and of the amount of money to be paid to each such city and town as determined
by the following section; provided, however, that if the measurable acreage of state-owned land
in the city or town has remained the same or increased from the previous fiscal year, the total
amount reimbursed to a city or town by the commonwealth pursuant to said section shall not be
less than the amount that was reimbursed to the city or town in the previous fiscal year.
SECTION 4. Said section 108 of said chapter 218 of the acts of 2016, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in section 17, the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the
following sentence:- The treasurer shall annually reimburse each city and town in which state-
owned land is located, an amount in lieu of taxes upon the reimbursement percentages reported
to the treasurer by the commissioner under the preceding section, determined by multiplying the
percentages by the amount appropriated for such purposes for the fiscal year; provided, however,
that if the measurable acreage of state-owned land in the city or town has remained the same or
increased from the previous fiscal year, the total amount reimbursed to a city or town by the
commonwealth shall not be less than the amount that was reimbursed to the city or town in the
previous fiscal year.
of 2